Hawaii statutes.
[§46-22.1 Salaries of members of council.]
Any law or county charter to the contrary notwithstanding, effective
July 1, 1969, the salaries of the members of the county legislative bodies
shall be as follows:

(1) In counties with more than 100,000 population:

Per
Year

Chairperson of the council.............. $16,000

Members of the council (each)...........
14,000

(2) In counties with less than 100,000 population:

Chairperson of the council..............
12,000

Members of the council (each)........... 10,800

[L 1969, c 127, §29; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next